North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 25. Disruption on Campuses of State-Owned Institutions of Higher Education.

§ 116-212.
Campus of state-supported institution of higher education subject to curfew.

The chancellor or president of any state-supported institution of higher learning may designate periods of time during which the campuses of such institutions and designated buildings and facilities connected therewith are off-limits and subject to a curfew as to all persons who are not faculty members, staff personnel, currently enrolled students of that institution, local law-enforcement officers, members of the National Guard on active duty, members of the General Assembly, the Governor of North Carolina and/or his designated agents, persons authorized by the chief administrative officer of the institution or his designated agent, and any person who satisfactorily identifies himself as a reporter for any newspaper, magazine, radio or television station. Any person not herein authorized who comes onto or remains on said campus in violation of this section shall be punished as set out in

G.S. 116-213

.

History.

1969, c. 860, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the first sentence.

§ 116-213.
Violation of curfew a misdemeanor; punishment.

Any person who during such period of curfew utilizes sound-amplifying equipment of any kind or nature upon the premises subject to such curfew in an educational, administrative building, or in any facility owned or controlled by the State or a State institution of higher learning, or upon the campus or grounds of any such institution, without the permission of the administrative head of the institution or his designated agent, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. For the purposes of this section the term “sound-amplifying equipment” shall mean any device, machine, or mechanical contrivance which is capable of amplifying sound and capable of delivering an electrical input of one or more watts to the loudspeaker, but this section shall not include radios and televisions.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of

G.S. 116-212

or 116-213, or who shall enter a plea of guilty to such violation or a plea of nolo contendere, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1969, c. 860, ss. 2, 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 895; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§§ 116-214 through 116-218.

Reserved for future codification purposes.